hu: Fagyasztási módszer: Kompresszor (önhűtő); Fagyasztótál; Kézi hajtókar; Só és jég; Álló mixer tartozék; Egyéb
pt-PT: Método de congelação: Compressor (auto-refrigerante); Tigela para congelador; Manivela manual; Sal e gelo; Acessório de batedeira; Outro
hr-HR: Metoda zamrzavanja: Kompresor (samostalno hlađenje); Zdjela za zamrzavanje; Ručna poluga; Sol i led; Nastavak za samostojeći mikser; Ostalo
ko: 냉동 방식: 컴프레서(자체 냉각식); 냉동 용기; 수동 핸드 크랭크; 소금/얼음; 스탠드 믹서 부속품; 기타
th: วิธีการแช่แข็ง: คอมเพรสเซอร์ (ทำความเย็นในตัว); ถ้วยแช่แข็ง; แบบมือหมุน; เกลือและน้ำแข็ง; อุปกรณ์เสริมเครื่องผสมอาหารแบบตั้งโต๊ะ; อื่นๆ
da: Frysemetode: Kompressor (selvkølende); Fryserskål; Manuel håndsving; Salt og is; Stående mixertilbehør; Andet
bg-BG: Метод на замразяване: Компресор (самоохлаждащ се); Купа за замразяване; Ръчна манивела; Сол и лед; Приставка за стационарен миксер; Друго
ru: Метод заморозки: Компрессорный (самоохлаждающийся); Чаша с хладагентом; Ручной привод; Соль и лед; Насадка для стационарного миксера; Другой
pt-BR: Método de congelamento: Compressor (autorrefrigerante); Recipiente para congelador; Manivela acionada manualmente; Sal e gelo; Acessório para batedeira planetária; Outro
nb: Frysemetode: Kompressor (selvkjølende); Frysebolle; Manuell håndsveiv; Salt og is; Stativmiksertilbehør; Annet
tr: Dondurma yöntemi: Kompresör (kendinden soğutmalı); Dondurucu haznesi; Manuel el krankı; Tuz ve buz; Stand mikser aparatı; Diğer
fr: Méthode de congélation: Compresseur (auto-réfrigérant); Bac de congélation; Manivelle manuelle; Sel et glace; Accessoire pour robot pâtissier; Autre
sk-SK: Metóda mrazenia: Kompresor (samostatne chladiaci); Mraziaca misa; Ručná kľuka; Soľ a ľad; Nadstavec stolného mixéra; Iné
zh-CN: 冷冻方法: 压缩机（自制冷）; 冷冻碗; 手摇式; 盐和冰; 台式搅拌机附件; 其他
ro-RO: Metoda de congelare: Compresor (autorefrigerant); Bol de congelator; Manivelă manuală; Sare și gheață; Accesoriu mixer vertical; Altele
zh-TW: 冷凍方式: 壓縮機 (自行製冷); 冷凍碗; 手動曲柄; 鹽和冰混合; 立式攪拌機配件; 其他
ja: 冷凍方法: コンプレッサー（自己冷凍式）; フリーザーボウル; 手動ハンドクランク; 塩と氷; スタンドミキサーアタッチメント; その他
cs: Metoda mražení: Kompresor (vlastní chlazení); Namrazovací mísa; Ruční klika; Sůl a led; Nástavec pro kuchyňský robot; Jiné
fi: Pakastusmenetelmä: Kompressori (itsejäähtyvä); Pakastinkulho; Manuaalinen käsikampi; Suola ja jää; Yleiskoneen lisäosa; Muu
vi: Phương pháp cấp đông: Máy nén (tự làm lạnh); Bát đông lạnh; Tay quay thủ công; Muối và đá; Phụ kiện máy trộn đứng; Khác
de: Gefriermethode: Kompressor (selbstkühlend); Gefrierbehälter; Handkurbel; Salz und Eis; Standmixer-Aufsatz; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Užšaldymo būdas: Kompresorius (savarankiškai šaldantis); Šaldiklio dubuo; Rankinis suktuvas; Druska ir ledas; Stovinio maišytuvo priedas; Kita
it: Metodo di congelamento: Compressore (autorefrigerante); Vaschetta da congelatore; Manovella manuale; Sale e ghiaccio; Accessorio per impastatrice planetaria; Altro
pl: Metoda zamrażania: Kompresorowa (samochłodząca); Misa mrożąca; Ręczna korbka; Sól i lód; Nakładka do miksera; Pozostałe
sl-SI: Metoda zamrzovanja: Kompresor (samozahlajevalni); Skleda za zamrzovalnik; Ročna ročica; Sol in led; Nastavek za stoječi mešalnik; Druga
sv: Frysningsmetod: Kompressor (självkylande); Frysskål; Manuell handvev; Salt och is; Tillbehör för köksmaskin; Övrigt
nl: Koeltechnologie: Compressor (zelfkoelend); Koelelement; Handmatige zwengel; Zout en ijs; Opzetstuk voor staande mixer; Overig
es: Método de congelación: Compresor (autorefrigerante); Bol apto para el congelador; Manivela manual; Sal y hielo; Accesorio para batidora de pie; Otros
en: Freezing method: Compressor (self-refrigerating); Freezer bowl; Manual hand crank; Salt & ice; Stand mixer attachment; Other
el: Μέθοδος κατάψυξης: Με συμπιεστή (αυτοψυκτικό); Με προψυχόμενο κάδο; Χειροκίνητο με μανιβέλα; Αλάτι & πάγος; Εξάρτημα για επιτραπέζιο μίξερ; Άλλο